Kentucky statutes. TITLE II Legislative Branch
Representative Districts

5.200.
Division of Commonwealth into representative districts.

The Commonwealth of Kentucky is divided into one hundred (100) representative districts as provided by KRS

5.201

to

5.300

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1991 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, § 101, effective January 8, 1992.

5.201.
First Representative District.

The First Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Ballard KY

County: Carlisle KY

County: Fulton KY

County: Hickman KY

County: McCracken KY (part)

A102 - Kennedy

A119 - Jetton

B120 - Rolling Hills

B121 - Lone Oak #1

B124 - Lone Oak #2

B125 - Massac Milan

B134 - Peppers Mill

B135 - Highland

C102 - Gallman

C106 - Williams

C107 - Cecil

C110 - Maxon

C112 - Lamont

C113 - Grahamville

C114 - Woodville

C115 - Ragland

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, § 1, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, § 1, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 1, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 39, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 1, effective January 20, 2022.

5.202.
Second Representative District.

The Second Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Graves KY

County: McCracken KY (part)

A120 - Harper #1

A121 - Hendron #3

A122 - Hendron #1

B117 - Hendron #2

B119 - Melber

B122 - Harper #2

B127 - New Hope

B129 - Hendron #4

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, § 2, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, § 2, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 2, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 40, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 2, effective January 20, 2022.

5.203.
Third Representative District.

The Third Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Livingston KY

County: McCracken KY (part)

A104 - Union Station

A106 - Butler-Farley

A112 - Reidland #1

A113 - Reidland #2

A114 - Clarks River #1

A115 - Woodlawn

A116 - Hovekamp

A124 - Oakdale

A134 - Rosebower

B103 - Savage

B113 - Paxton Park

B116 - Yancy

B118 - Emma Morgan

B123 - Cherokee

B126 - Lone Oak #3

B131 - Bernhard

B132 - Wallace Park

C108 - Lang 1

C109 - Concord

C119 - Cardinal Point

C120 - Carson Park

C121 - Avondale

C122 - Country Club

C123 - Reed

C125 - Gott

C128 - Lang 2

C129 - Strawberry Hill

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
3, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
3, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002 Ky. Acts ch. 1, §
3, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 41, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 3, effective January 20, 2022.

5.204.
Fourth Representative District.

The Fourth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Hopkins KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
4, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
4, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., 2002, ch. 1, §
4, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 42, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 4, effective January 20, 2022.

5.205.
Fifth Representative District.

The Fifth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Calloway KY

County: Trigg KY (part)

A102 - Hamtown

B101 - West Cadiz

B102 - Canton #2

F101 - Linton-Maggie

F102 - Canton 1

G101 - Bethesda

G102 - Northwest Cadiz

X002 - X002

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
5, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
5, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
5, effective January 31, 2002., repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 43, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 5, effective January 20, 2022.

5.206.
Sixth Representative District.

The Sixth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Lyon KY

County: Marshall KY

County: McCracken KY (part)

A110 - Clarks River #2

A117 - Oaks Station

A118 - Florence Station

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
6, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
6, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
6, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 44, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 6, effective January 20, 2022.

5.207.
Seventh Representative District.

The Seventh Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Daviess KY (part)

A101 - Owensboro #1

A102 - Owensboro #2

A105 - Owensboro #5

A108 - Owensboro #8

A110 - Owensboro #10

A129 - Owensboro #29

A130 - Owensboro #30

A135 - Owensboro #35

A136 - Owensboro #36

A138 - Owensboro #38

A139 - Owensboro #39

A140 - Owensboro #40

A143 - Owensboro #43

A146 - Owensboro #46

A150 - Owensboro #50 - No Voters

B101 - Southtown

B102 - Northtown

B103 - Rome

B104 - Westside

C101 - Sorgho

C102 - Stanley

D102 - Saint Joseph

D103 - West Louisville

E104 - Southern Oaks

F102 - Masonville

H101 - Fields

H113 - Windridge

H117 - Lake Forest

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
7, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
7, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
7, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 45, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 7, effective January 20, 2022.

5.208.
Eighth Representative District.

The Eighth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Caldwell KY

County: Christian KY (part)

A101 - Courthouse

A103 - Walnut St Center #2

B101 - Christian Co Mi School #1

B102 - Christian Co Mi School #2

B103 - New Palestine Baptist Ch

C101 - Recreation Department

C102 - Senior Citizens Center

C103 - Friendship House

C104 - New Work Fellowship

C105 - Sinking Fork Elementary

C106 - Millbrooke Elementary #1

D104 - Herndon Vol Fire Dept

D105 - Lafayette Vol Fire Dept

D106 - Living Hope Baptist

D107 - Millbrooke Elem School #2

E101 - Pennyrile Rural Electric

E102 - St John #1

E105 - St John #2

County: Trigg KY (part)

A101 - South Cadiz #1

C101 - North Cadiz #1

D101 - Cerulean-Wallonia

D102 - East Montgomery

D103 - North Cadiz 2

E101 - Roaring Springs

E102 - West Montgomery

E104 - South Cadiz 2

X001 - X001

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
8, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
8, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
8, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 46, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 8, effective January 20, 2022.

5.209.
Ninth Representative District.

The Ninth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Christian KY (part)

A102 - Walnut St Center #1

A104 - Walnut St Center #3

A105 - Hillcrest Baptist Church

B104 - Life Tabernacle Church #1

D101 - Indian Hills Elementar #1

D102 - Indian Hills Elementar #2

D103 - Hopkinsville Mi School #1

E103 - Hopkinsville Mi School #2

E104 - Stadium of Champions

F101 - Lakeview Baptist Church

F102 - Pembroke Baptist Church

F103 - Salem Baptist Church

F104 - Valor Hall #1

G101 - Southside Ch of Christ

G102 - Valor Hall #2

G103 - Christian Co Ag Ext Offic

G104 - Bruce Convention Ctr. #1

G105 - Valor Hall #3

G106 - Bruce Convention Ctr. #2

H101 - Life Tabernacle Church #2

H103 - Concord Baptist Church

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
9, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
9, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
9, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 47, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 9, effective January 20, 2022.

5.210.
Tenth Representative District.

The Tenth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Breckinridge KY

County: Hardin KY (part)

A007 - Veterans

D005 - Helmwood Heights

G006 - Cecilia

G007 - Saint John

G008 - Howevalley

G009 - Rineyville South

H001 - Rineyville North

H003 - Grandview

H004 - Rineyville West

H005 - Vine Grove East

H006 - Vine Grove West

H007 - Vine Grove South

H008 - Yates

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
10, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
10, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
10, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 48, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 10, effective January 20, 2022.

5.211.
Eleventh Representative District.

The Eleventh Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Henderson KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
11, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
11, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
11, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 49, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 11, effective January 20, 2022.

5.212.
Twelfth Representative District.

The Twelfth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Crittenden KY

County: McLean KY

County: Union KY

County: Webster KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
12, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
12, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
12, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 50, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 12, effective January 20, 2022.

5.213.
Thirteenth Representative District.

The Thirteenth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Daviess KY (part)

A103 - Owensboro #3

A106 - Owensboro #6

A107 - Owensboro #7

A111 - Owensboro #11

A112 - Owensboro #12

A113 - Owensboro #13

A114 - Owensboro #14

A115 - Owensboro #15

A119 - Owensboro #19

A120 - Owensboro #20

A122 - Owensboro #22

A128 - Owensboro #28

H102 - North Seven Hills

H103 - Philpot West

H104 - Lockhart

H105 - Tollgate

H107 - Ensor

H109 - Thorobred East

H112 - Pleasant Valley

H114 - Thorobred West

H115 - Heartlands

H116 - Islandview

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
13, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
13, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
13, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 51, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 13, effective January 20, 2022.

5.214.
Fourteenth Representative District.

The Fourteenth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Daviess KY (part)

E102 - Pleasant Ridge

E103 - Utica

F101 - Whitesville South

F103 - Habit

G101 - Knottsville South

G102 - Maceo

G103 - Yelvington South

County: Hancock KY

County: Ohio KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
14, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
14, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
14, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 52, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 14, effective January 20, 2022.

5.215.
Fifteenth Representative District.

The Fifteenth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Butler KY

County: Muhlenberg KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
15, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
15, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
15, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 53, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 15, effective January 20, 2022.

5.216.
Sixteenth Representative District.

The Sixteenth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Christian KY (part)

H102 - Crofton Elementary

H104 - New Barren Springs

County: Logan KY

County: Todd KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
16, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
16, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
16, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 54, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 16, effective January 20, 2022.

5.217.
Seventeenth Representative District.

The Seventeenth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Warren KY (part)

B107 - Greenmeadows

B111 - Central

B112 - Stonehenge

B113 - Jennings

B114 - Douglas

B115 - Valleyview

B202 - 17-2-2

B203 - 17-2-3

B204 - 17-2-4

B205 - 17-2-5

C102 - Carver Harris

C104 - Mcneill

C105 - Cabell

C106 - Crestmoor

C107 - Hunting Creek

C109 - Csx Railroad

C111 - Hidden River

C112 - Three Springs

E101 - Blue Level

E106 - Browning

E107 - Cedar Grove

E108 - Hadley

E110 - Millers

E111 - Whispering Hills

E112 - Springhill

E113 - Res-Care

E201 - 19-5-1

E203 - 19-5-3

E204 - 19-5-4

E205 - 19-5-5

E206 - 19-5-6

E208 - 19-5-8

E209 - 16-5-9

F101 - Woodburn

F104 - Rockfield

F105 - Richpond

F113 - Hunters Crossing

F114 - Sutherland Farms

F115 - Greystone

F117 - Windover

F201 - 17-6-1

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
17, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
17, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
17, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 55, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 17, effective January 20, 2022.

5.218.
Eighteenth Representative District.

The Eighteenth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Grayson KY

County: Hardin KY (part)

E006 - Vanmeter City

F001 - Vanmeter

F003 - Country Club

F004 - Glendale

F005 - South Dixie

F006 - Sonora

F007 - Upton

F008 - Cash

G001 - East View

G002 - Stephensburg

G003 - Meeting Creek

G004 - White Mills

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
18, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
18, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
18, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 56, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 18, effective January 20, 2022.

5.219.
Nineteenth Representative District.

The Nineteenth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Edmonson KY

County: Warren KY (part)

B104 - Church Street

B105 - Delafield

B108 - Octagon Castle

D101 - Smiths Grove

D102 - Plum Springs

D103 - Hydro

D104 - Oakland

D105 - Gott

D106 - Warren East Middle Sch

D107 - Three Forks

D108 - Mt Victor

D111 - Northgate

D113 - Bristow

D114 - Countryside

E102 - Sandhill

E103 - Richardsville

E104 - Davenport

E105 - Riverside

E109 - Meadowland

F107 - Motley

F108 - Alvaton

F109 - Trammel Creek

F110 - Hardcastle

F111 - Olde Stone

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
19, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
19, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
19, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 57, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 19, effective January 20, 2022.

5.220.
Twentieth Representative District.

The Twentieth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Warren KY (part)

A101 - Peachtree

A102 - Crossridge

A103 - Municipal Park

A104 - Potter Gray

A105 - Natcher

A106 - Grider Pond

A107 - Briarwood

A108 - Shive Kiel

A109 - Greenwood

A110 - Eastwood

A111 - Airport

A112 - Middle Bridge

A113 - Campbell

A114 - Hartland

A115 - Watts Mill

A116 - Steeplechase

A117 - Wrenwood

A118 - Mooreland

A201 - 19-1-1

A202 - 19-1-2

A203 - 19-1-3

A204 - 19-1-4

A205 - 19-1-5

B101 - B.G. Towers

B102 - West 11th Street

B103 - Hillview

B106 - Reels

B109 - Fairview

B110 - Broadway

C101 - Bg Jr High

C103 - Tc Cherry

C108 - Cedarwood

C110 - Big Red

D109 - Cumberland Trace

D110 - Hillside

D112 - Riverview

D115 - Smith

D116 - Fruit of The Loom

D201 - 20-4-1

D202 - 20-4-2

D203 - 20-4-3

D204 - 20-4-4

D206 - 20-4-6

D207 - 20-4-7

F112 - Drakes Creek

F116 - Bluegrass

F119 - Jfs

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
20, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
20, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
20, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 58, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 20, effective January 20, 2022.

5.221.
Twenty-first Representative District.

The Twenty-first Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Adair KY

County: Cumberland KY

County: Metcalfe KY

County: Monroe KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
21, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
21, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
21, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 59, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 21, effective January 20, 2022.

5.222.
Twenty-second Representative District.

The Twenty-second Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Allen KY

County: Simpson KY

County: Warren KY (part)

F102 - Plano

F103 - Drake

F106 - Matlock

F118 - Larmon Mill

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
22, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
22, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
22, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 60, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 22, effective January 20, 2022.

5.223.
Twenty-third Representative District.

The Twenty-third Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Barren KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
23, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
23, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
23, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 61, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 23, effective January 20, 2022.

5.224.
Twenty-fourth Representative District.

The Twenty-fourth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Green KY

County: Hart KY

County: Larue KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
24, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
24, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., 2002, ch. 1, §
24, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 62, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 24, effective January 20, 2022.

5.225.
Twenty-fifth Representative District.

The Twenty-fifth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Hardin KY (part)

B003 - Shelton

B004 - Woodland

B005 - Longview

C001 - Highlands

C002 - City Park

C003 - Colesburg

C004 - Tunnel Hill

C005 - Lincoln Trail North

C006 - Lincoln Trail South

C007 - E-Town East

D001 - Mantle

D002 - Freeman

D003 - Oaklawn

D004 - Pinevalley

D006 - Helm

E001 - Central

E002 - E-Town North

E003 - E-Town West

E004 - Valley Creek

E005 - Memorial

E007 - Haycraft

F002 - Chelf

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
25, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
25, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
25, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 63, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 25, effective January 20, 2022.

5.226.
Twenty-sixth Representative District.

The Twenty-sixth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Bullitt KY (part)

A101 - Shepherdsville #1

A102 - Shephersdsville #1a

A105 - Cupio #13

A106 - Shepherdsville #2a

A107 - Brooks #12

A108 - Brooks #12a

B111 - Mt. Washington #9-B

C101 - Hebron #5

C103 - Zoneton # 11-A

C104 - Maryville South #19

C105 - Hebron #5a

C106 - Hebron #5b

C108 - Zoneton #11-B

C109 - Zoneton #11 North

C110 - Hebron #20

C111 - Hebron #21

C112 - Maryville South #19a

C113 - Zoneton #11

D101 - Lebanon Junction #14

D104 - Beech Grove #17

D108 - Shepherdsville #2

D113 - Beech Grove #17b

D114 - Beech Grove #17c

X001 - Ft. Knox

County: Hardin KY (part)

A001 - West Point

A009 - Fort Knox 26

B002 - Radcliff Southeast

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
26, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
26, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
26, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 64, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 26, effective January 20, 2022.

5.227.
Twenty-seventh Representative District.

The Twenty-seventh Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Hardin KY (part)

A002 - Radcliff East

A003 - Radcliff North

A004 - Radcliff Northwest

A005 - Radcliff West

A006 - Red Hill

A008 - Radcliff Southwest

A010 - Fort Knox 27

B001 - Radcliff South

B006 - Parkway

County: Meade KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
27, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
27, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
27, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 65, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 27, effective January 20, 2022.

5.228.
Twenty-eighth Representative District.

The Twenty-eighth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Jefferson KY (part)

A107 - Precinct 10728 District

A108 - Precinct 10828 District

A111 - Precinct 111 28 District

A113 - Precinct 11328 District

A114 - Precinct 11428 District

A115 - Precinct 11528 District

A118 - Precinct 11828 District

A119 - Precinct 11928 District

A121 - Precinct 12128 District

A124 - Precinct 12428 District

A125 - Precinct 125 28 District

A126 - Precinct 12628 District

A127 - Precinct 12728 District

A128 - Precinct 12828 District

A129 - Precinct 12928 District

A134 - Precinct 13428 District

A136 - Precinct 13628 District

A139 - Precinct 13928 District

A141 - Precinct 14128 District

A142 - Precinct 14228 District

A143 - Precinct 14328 District

J144 - Precinct 14438 District

K128 - Precinct 128 40 District

K132 - Precinct 132 40 District

O114 - Precinct 114 44 District

O115 - Precinct 115 44 District

O128 - Precinct 128 44 District

O129 - Precinct 129 44 District

O133 - Precinct 133 44 District

O134 - Precinct 134 44 District

O137 - Precinct 137 44 District

O143 - Precinct 143 44 District

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
28, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
28, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
28, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 66, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 28, effective January 20, 2022.

5.229.
Twenty-ninth Representative District.

The Twenty-ninth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Jefferson KY (part)

B124 - Precinct 124 29 District

B134 - Precinct 134 29 District

B149 - Precinct 149 29 District

B153 - Precinct 153 29 District

B154 - Precinct 154 29 District

B158 - Precinct 158 29 District

B159 - Precinct 159 29 District

B160 - Precinct 160 29 District

B161 - Precinct 161 29 District

B162 - Precinct 162 29 District

B163 - Precinct 163 29 District

B166 - Precinct 166 29 District

B168 - Precinct 168 29 District

B169 - Precinct 169 29 District

B172 - Precinct 172 29 District

B173 - Precinct 173 29 District

B175 - Precinct 175 29 District

B177 - Precinct 177 29 District

B183 - Precinct 183 29 District

B184 - Precinct 184 29 District

I147 - Precinct 147 37 District

I148 - Precinct 148 37 District

I155 - Precinct 155 37 District

Q119 - Precinct 119 46 District

Q139 - Precinct 139 46 District

V102 - Precinct 102 36 District

V103 - Precinct 103 36 District

V132 - Precinct 132 36 District

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
29, effective January 8, 1992; 1992, ch. 369, §
1; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
29, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
29, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 67, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 29, effective January 20, 2022.

5.230.
Thirtieth Representative District.

The Thirtieth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Jefferson KY (part)

C101 - Precinct 101 30 District

C102 - Precinct 102 30 District

C103 - Precinct 103 30 District

C104 - Precinct 104 30 District

C105 - Precinct 105 30 District

C106 - Precinct 106 30 District

C108 - Precinct 108 30 District

C109 - Precinct 109 30 District

C110 - Precinct 110 30 District

C111 - Precinct 111 30 District

C113 - Precinct 113 30 District

C115 - Precinct 115 30 District

C123 - Precinct 123 30 District

C124 - Precinct 124 30 District

C126 - Precinct 126 30 District

C128 - Precinct 128 30 District

C129 - Precinct 129 30 District

C130 - Precinct 130 30 District

C131 - Precinct 131 30 District

C134 - Precinct 134 30 District

C137 - Precinct 137 30 District

C138 - Precinct 138 30 District

C144 - Precinct 144 30 District

C151 - Precinct 151 30 District

H127 - Precinct 127 35 District

Q101 - Precinct 101 46 District

Q122 - Precinct 122 46 District

Q123 - Precinct 123 46 District

Q124 - Precinct 124 46 District

Q134 - Precinct 134 46 District

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
30, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, 1, §
30, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
30, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 68, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 30, effective January 20, 2022.

5.231.
Thirty-first Representative District.

The Thirty-first Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Jefferson KY (part)

B181 - Precinct 181 29 District

B182 - Precinct 182 29 District

D114 - Precinct 114 31 District

D116 - Precinct 116 31 District

D117 - Precinct 117 31 District

D120 - Precinct 120 31 District

D122 - Precinct 122 31 District

D132 - Precinct 132 31 District

D137 - Precinct 137 31 District

D139 - Precinct 139 31 District

D141 - Precinct 141 31 District

D142 - Precinct 142 31 District

E160 - Precinct 160 32 District

E161 - Precinct 161 32 District

E163 - Precinct 163 32 District

E164 - Precinct 164 32 District

E165 - Precinct 165 32 District

E166 - Precinct 166 32 District

E167 - Precinct 167 32 District

E168 - Precinct 168 32 District

E169 - Precinct 169 32 District

E177 - Precinct 177 32 District

E178 - Precinct 178 32 District

E179 - Precinct 179 32 District

E180 - Precinct 180 32 District

F156 - Precinct 156 33 District

F161 - Precinct 161 33 District

F166 - Precinct 166 33 District

V115 - Precinct 115 36 District

V117 - Precinct 117 36 District

V119 - Precinct 119 36 District

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
31, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
31, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
31, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 69, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 31, effective January 20, 2022.

5.232.
Thirty-second Representative District.

The Thirty-second Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Jefferson KY (part)

E139 - Precinct 139 32 District

E141 - Precinct 141 32 District

E142 - Precinct 142 32 District

E143 - Precinct 143 32 District

E144 - Precinct 144 32 District

E145 - Precinct 145 32 District

E154 - Precinct 154 32 District

E155 - Precinct 155 32 District

E157 - Precinct 157 32 District

E162 - Precinct 162 32 District

E171 - Precinct 171 32 District

E173 - Precinct 173 32 District

E175 - Precinct 175 32 District

E176 - Precinct 176 32 District

E181 - Precinct 181 32 District

E183 - Precinct 183 32 District

E185 - Precinct 185 32 District

F181 - Precinct 181 33 District

F182 - Precinct 182 33 District

F185 - Precinct 185 33 District

F186 - Precinct 186 33 District

F187 - Precinct 187 33 District

L153 - Precinct 153 41 District

N143 - Precinct 143 43 District

N144 - Precinct 144 43 District

S119 - Precinct 119 48 District

S131 - Precinct 131 48 District

S132 - Precinct 132 48 District

S135 - Precinct 135 48 District

S141 - Precinct 141 48 District

S142 - Precinct 142 48 District

S146 - Precinct 146 48 District

S150 - Precinct 150 48 District

S152 - Precinct 152 48 District

S156 - Precinct 156 48 District

S164 - Precinct 164 48 District

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
32, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
32, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
32, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 70, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 32, effective January 20, 2022.

5.233.
Thirty-third Representative District.

The Thirty-third Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Jefferson KY (part)

F106 - Precinct 106 33 District

F145 - Precinct 145 33 District

F151 - Precinct 151 33 District

F152 - Precinct 152 33 District

F153 - Precinct 153 33 District

F154 - Precinct 154 33 District

F155 - Precinct 155 33 District

F158 - Precinct 158 33 District

F163 - Precinct 163 33 District

F164 - Precinct 164 33 District

F167 - Precinct 167 33 District

F169 - Precinct 169 33 District

F170 - Precinct 170 33 District

F171 - Precinct 171 33 District

F172 - Precinct 172 33 District

F176 - Precinct 176 33 District

F179 - Precinct 179 33 District

F180 - Precinct 180 33 District

F183 - Precinct 183 33 District

F184 - Precinct 184 33 District

V124 - Precinct 124 36 District

V128 - Precinct 128 36 District

County: Oldham KY (part)

E101 - East Worth

E102 - West Worth

E103 - South Pewee Valley

E104 - Bernard

E105 - Worth

E106 - Northwood

H103 - North Pewee Valley

H104 - Crestwood

H106 - South Crestwood

County: Shelby KY (part)

F104 - Long Run

F105 - Persimmon Ridge

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
33, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
33, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
33, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 71, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 33, effective January 20, 2022.

5.234.
Thirty-fourth Representative District.

The Thirty-fourth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Jefferson KY (part)

D101 - Precinct 101 31 District

D104 - Precinct 104 31 District

D106 - Precinct 106 31 District

D108 - Precinct 108 31 District

D109 - Precinct 109 31 District

D115 - Precinct 115 31 District

D129 - Precinct 129 31 District

E158 - Precinct 158 32 District

E159 - Precinct 159 32 District

G140 - Precinct 140 34 District

G141 - Precinct 141 34 District

G142 - Precinct 142 34 District

G143 - Precinct 143 34 District

G144 - Precinct 144 34 District

G145 - Precinct 145 34 District

G146 - Precinct 146 34 District

G150 - Precinct 150 34 District

G156 - Precinct 156 34 District

G157 - Precinct 157 34 District

G158 - Precinct 158 34 District

G159 - Precinct 159 34 District

G160 - Precinct 160 34 District

G161 - Precinct 161 34 District

G162 - Precinct 162 34 District

G163 - Precinct 163 34 District

G164 - Precinct 164 34 District

G165 - Precinct 165 34 District

G168 - Precinct 168 34 District

G169 - Precinct 169 34 District

L117 - Precinct 117 41 District

L118 - Precinct 118 41 District

L119 - Precinct 119 41 District

L134 - Precinct 134 41 District

L135 - Precinct 135 41 District

L136 - Precinct 136 41 District

L138 - Precinct 138 41 District

L139 - Precinct 139 41 District

L146 - Precinct 146 41 District

L151 - Precinct 151 41 District

L152 - Precinct 152 41 District

M137 - Precinct 137 42 District

M138 - Precinct 138 42 District

M164 - Precinct 164 42 District

N125 - Precinct 125 43 District

N142 - Precinct 142 43 District

N146 - Precinct 146 43 District

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2nd Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
34, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
34, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
34, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 72, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 34, effective January 20, 2022.

5.235.
Thirty-fifth Representative District.

The Thirty-fifth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Jefferson KY (part)

C143 - Precinct 143 30 District

H117 - Precinct 117 35 District

H120 - Precinct 120 35 District

H121 - Precinct 121 35 District

H123 - Precinct 123 35 District

H124 - Precinct 124 35 District

H125 - Precinct 125 35 District

H126 - Precinct 126 35 District

H130 - Precinct 130 35 District

H138 - Precinct 138 35 District

H144 - Precinct 144 35 District

H146 - Precinct 146 35 District

H147 - Precinct 147 35 District

H154 - Precinct 154 35 District

H155 - Precinct 155 35 District

H161 - Precinct 161 35 District

I112 - Precinct 112 37 District

I115 - Precinct 115 37 District

I120 - Precinct 120 37 District

I123 - Precinct 123 37 District

I124 - Precinct 124 37 District

I138 - Precinct 138 37 District

I142 - Precinct 142 37 District

I149 - Precinct 149 37 District

I150 - Precinct 150 37 District

J114 - Precinct 114 38 District

J148 - Precinct 148 38 District

J149 - Precinct 149 38 District

J151 - Precinct 151 38 District

K149 - Precinct 149 40 District

Q104 - Precinct 104 46 District

Q112 - Precinct 112 46 District

Q116 - Precinct 116 46 District

Q136 - Precinct 136 46 District

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
35, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
35, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
35, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 73, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 35, effective January 20, 2022.

5.236.
Thirty-sixth Representative District.

The Thirty-sixth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Jefferson KY (part)

B151 - Precinct 151 29 District

B170 - Precinct 170 29 District

V101 - Precinct 101 36 District

V104 - Precinct 104 36 District

V105 - Precinct 105 36 District

V106 - Precinct 106 36 District

V107 - Precinct 107 36 District

V108 - Precinct 108 36 District

V109 - Precinct 109 36 District

V110 - Precinct 110 36 District

V111 - Precinct 111 36 District

V112 - Precinct 112 36 District

V113 - Precinct 113 36 District

V114 - Precinct 114 36 District

V116 - Precinct 116 36 District

V118 - Precinct 118 36 District

V120 - Precinct 120 36 District

V121 - Precinct 121 36 District

V122 - Precinct 122 36 District

V123 - Precinct 123 36 District

V125 - Precinct 125 36 District

V126 - Precinct 126 36 District

V127 - Precinct 127 36 District

V129 - Precinct 129 36 District

V130 - Precinct 130 36 District

V131 - Precinct 131 36 District

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
36, effective January 8, 1992; 1992, ch. 369, §
3, effective January 1, 1993; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
36, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
36, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 74, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 36, effective January 20, 2022.

5.237.
Thirty-seventh Representative District.

The Thirty-seventh Representative District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Bullitt KY (part)

C102 - Maryville #6

C107 - Maryville #6a

County: Jefferson KY (part)

A130 - Precinct 130 28 District

H145 - Precinct 145 35 District

H148 - Precinct 148 35 District

H156 - Precinct 156 35 District

H159 - Precinct 159 35 District

H160 - Precinct 160 35 District

H162 - Precinct 162 35 District

I126 - Precinct 126 37 District

I130 - Precinct 130 37 District

I133 - Precinct 133 37 District

I135 - Precinct 135 37 District

I141 - Precinct 141 37 District

I143 - Precinct 143 37 District

I144 - Precinct 144 37 District

I145 - Precinct 145 37 District

I146 - Precinct 146 37 District

I151 - Precinct 151 37 District

I152 - Precinct 152 37 District

I153 - Precinct 153 37 District

I154 - Precinct 154 37 District

J141 - Precinct 141 38 District

J155 - Precinct 155 38 District

O142 - Precinct 142 44 District

Q105 - Precinct 105 46 District

Q113 - Precinct 113 46 District

Q114 - Precinct 114 46 District

Q117 - Precinct 117 46 District

Q126 - Precinct 126 46 District

Q131 - Precinct 131 46 District

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Extra. Sess.), ch. 5, §
37, effective January 8, 1992; 1992, ch. 369, §
2, effective January 1, 1993; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 1, §
37, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, §
37, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 75, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 7, § 37, effective January 20, 2022.